Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1096.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 87SUPPLEMENTAL FUNDING FOR RURAL INFRASTRUCTURESec.8701. Authority to incur debt.8702. Process.§ 8701. Authority to incur debt.(a) Debt for bridge projects.--The department may incur debt as provided under this chapter to improve the department's bridges on three or four digit State routes on the non-Federal aid highway system in this Commonwealth. The following shall apply:123456789101112131415161718 (1) Funds authorized under this chapter shall be used to supplement, and not supplant, money otherwise available for projects.(2) The department shall prioritize funds to improve bridges Statewide based on condition.(3) The department shall consult with the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Transportation Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Transportation Committee of the House of Representatives, then develop a plan to deliver bridge projects Statewide in accordance with this section and post the plan on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(4) Projects shall be bid using the department's engineering and construction management system.(5) The department shall ensure that projects are bid within two years and completed within five years.(b) Use of savings.--From the additional debt to be incurred for bridges under this chapter, the department shall use savings to improve the department's highways on three or four digit State routes on the non-Federal aid highway system in this Commonwealth. Highway projects under this subsection shall be bid using the department's engineering and construction management system and adhere to the provisions of this chapter.(c) Ineligibility.--The following are ineligible uses of funds under this chapter:(1) Preservation strategies, commonly referred to as oil and chip or sealcoat.(2) Patching and sealing.(3) Any construction, reconstruction or maintenance work performed by the department's county maintenance districts.20250SB1096PN1317 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 8702. Process.(a) Additional debt.--The maximum principal amount of additional debt to be incurred under this chapter for capital bridge projects specifically itemized in a capital project itemization act pursuant to section 7(a)(4) of Article VIII of the Constitution of Pennsylvania shall be $600,000,000. Debt shall be incurred in accordance with the act of February 9, 1999 (P.L.1, No.1), known as the Capital Facilities Debt Enabling Act, and the Motor License Fund shall be charged with the repayment of the debt. The net proceeds from the sale of obligations authorized in this section are appropriated to the department to be used exclusively to defray financial costs of capital bridge projects specifically itemized in accordance with the Capital Facilities Debt Enabling Act.(b) Appropriation.--The money necessary to pay debt service or to pay arbitrage rebates required under section 148 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (Public Law 99-514, 26 U.S.C. § 148) due on the obligations under this section is appropriated to the State Treasurer from the Motor License Fund.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB1096PN1317 - 3 - 1234567891011121314151617181920